Florida, session 2026, HB1357.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1357 2026

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Florida
Retirement Savings Task Force Act."
Section 2. Section 445.15, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
445.15 Florida Retirement Savings Task Force.—
(1) There is created adjunct to the department the Florida
Retirement Savings Task Force, a task force as defined in s.
20.03(5). The department shall provide administrative,
technical, and staff support to the task force. The purpose of
the task force is to examine and develop recommendations to
expand access to retirement savings vehicles for private sector
employees who lack employer-sponsored retirement plans.
(2) The task force shall be composed of 15 members, as
follows:
(a) An actuarial or investment specialist well-versed in
long-term asset performance, appointed by the Governor.
(b) A community advocate who represents a low-income or
underserved community, appointed by the Governor.
(c) An attorney or policy analyst well-versed in labor
law, pension regulation, or state legislative frameworks,
appointed by the Governor.
(d) A representative from the American Association of
Retired Persons who may provide insight into senior financial
security and retirement readiness, appointed by the Governor.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1357 2026
(e) A Florida resident who has demonstrated experience in
retirement planning or workforce financial education, appointed
by the Governor.
(f) A current employee of the Department of Management
Services of the Division of Retirement, appointed by the
President of the Senate.
(g) A representative from the public sector, appointed by
the President of the Senate.
(h) A small business owner, appointed by the President of
the Senate.
(i) A certified financial planner, appointed by the
President of the Senate.
(j) A professor from a state university whose area of
academic research is labor economics, demography, or retirement
system design, appointed by the President of the Senate.
(k) A current employee of the department, appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(l) A representative from the private sector or a
nontraditional employment area, appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives.
(m) A representative from a large employer or an employer
association, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
(n) A retirement policy analyst who is familiar with the
Florida Retirement System, appointed by the Speaker of the House
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1357 2026
of Representatives.
(o) A professor from a state university whose area of
academic research is labor economics, demography, or retirement
system design, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
(3)(a) The task force shall convene no later than 60 days
after the effective date of this act and shall meet quarterly
thereafter or upon the call of the chair.
(b) At its first meeting, the task force shall elect a
chair and a vice chair from among its members.
(c) The task force may meet using communications media
technology as defined in s. 120.54(5)(b)2.
(d) Members serve without compensation but are entitled to
reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses as provided in s.
112.061.
(4) At a minimum, the task force shall do all of the
following:
(a) Assess current coverage gaps in this state in private
sector retirement.
(b) Review existing state and national models for
retirement plans.
(c) Propose policy, design, and implementation
recommendations.
(d) Identify regulatory, administrative, and financial
100 barriers to implementation.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1357-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1357 2026
101 (e) Evaluate fiscal impacts and possible funding
102 mechanisms.
103 (5) The task force may receive confidential or exempt
104 information from state agencies, and the task force must
105 maintain the confidential and exempt nature of such information
106 to the extent allowed by law.
107 (6)(a) No later than December 1, 2026, the task force
108 shall submit an interim report to the Governor, the President of
109 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives
110 which outlines the task force's initial findings.
111 (b) No later than June 1, 2027, the task force shall
112 submit to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the
113 Speaker of the House of Representatives the final report that
114 includes actionable recommendations and proposed statutory
115 language for expanding access to retirement savings vehicles for
116 private-sector employees who lack employer-sponsored retirement
117 plans.
118 (7) This section expires July 1, 2028, unless reenacted by
119 the Legislature.
120 Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1357-00